Utah statutes.
17-22-4.   Jails -- Sheriff as keeper -- Use.

(1)  The common jails in the several counties shall be kept by the sheriffs, and shall be used for:

(a)  the detention of persons committed to jail to secure their attendance as witnesses in criminal cases;

(b)  the detention of persons charged with crime and committed for trial;

(c)  the confinement of persons committed for contempt, or upon civil process, or by other authority of law; and

(d)  the confinement of persons sentenced to imprisonment upon conviction of crime.

(2)  If the county executive contracts with a private contractor to manage, maintain, operate, or construct county jail facilities, the sheriff shall perform whatever obligations are imposed upon him by that contract.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

